New York, session 2025-2026, S5051.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 7903 of the insurance law, as 2 amended by chapter 409 of the laws of 2012, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contra- 5 ry, the marketing, sale, offering for sale, issuance, making, proposing 6 to make and administration of service contracts by any provider, admin- 7 istrator or other person, shall be exempt from all other provisions of 8 this chapter. A provider may, but is not required to, appoint an admin- 9 istrator or other designee to be responsible for any or all of the 10 administration of service contracts and compliance with this article. 11 Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a provider of a 12 service contract, as defined in paragraphs two and three of subsection 13 (k) of section seven thousand nine hundred two of this article, shall, 14 at least thirty days prior to the effective date of an initial provider 15 fee, or a change in a provider fee, file the amount of the provider fee 16 with the superintendent and such filing shall be open to public 17 inspection; and provided further that the provider fee shall not exceed 18 the amount filed; and provided further that the provisions of this 19 subsection shall not apply to contracts under paragraph three of 20 subsection (k) of section seven thousand nine hundred two of this arti- 21 cle. The requirement to file the amount of the provider fee with the 22 superintendent in this subsection shall not apply to fees set forth in 23 any agreement to which an authorized insurer is a party. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01457-01-5